Utah statutes.
53B-16-104.   Restrictions on higher education entities bidding on architect or engineering services in public procurement projects.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Architect-engineer services" means those professional services within the scope of the practice of architecture as defined in Section 58-3a-102, or professional engineering as defined in Section 58-22-102.

(b)  "Government entity" means a state agency, an institution of higher education, a county, a municipality, a local school district, a local district, or a special service district.

(2)  When a government entity elects to obtain architect or engineering services by using a competitive procurement process and has provided public notice of its competitive procurement process:

(a)  a higher education entity, or any part of one, may not submit a proposal in response to the government entity's competitive procurement process; and

(b)  the government entity may not award a contract to perform the architect or engineering services solicited in the competitive procurement process to a higher education entity or any part of one.

(3) (a)  Subject to the prohibition contained in Subsection (3)(b), an employee of a higher education entity may, in a private capacity, submit a proposal in response to the competitive procurement process.

(b)  An employee of a higher education entity may not use any supplies, materials, or other resources owned by, or any persons matriculating at, attending, or employed by, the higher education entity in:

(i)  preparing a response to the competitive procurement process; or

(ii)  completing any work, assignment, or contract awarded to the employee resulting from that competitive procurement process.

